Tennessee, session 114, SB2340.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-3-307, is amended by deleting
"twenty (20) days" in subdivisions (a)(6) and (b)(1) and substituting "twenty-five (25) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2340
011948
- 1 -